Nebraska, session 109, LB1046.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1046 LB1046
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Commercial name, image, and likeness activity means any
transaction or agreement in which a student-participant receives
compensation, monetary or otherwise, in exchange for use of such
student's name, image, and likeness;
(b) Name, image, and likeness means attributes that identify a
specific person, including such person's name, image, likeness, voice,
signature, or other personal identifiers;
(c) School property and identifiers includes any school name,
mascot, logo, uniform, facility, equipment, or official game or practice
recording; and
(d) Student-participant means a high school student in this state
who participates in interscholastic athletics or activities at a high
school that is a member of an athletics or activities association.
(2) On or before January 1, 2027, the State Board of Education shall
adopt a model policy relating to name, image, and likeness rights of
student-participants. Such policy shall:
(a) Allow a student-participant to:
(i) Engage in commercial name, image, and likeness activities
individually or with assistance from agents, attorneys, or
representatives; and
(ii) Retain eligibility to participate in interscholastic athletics
or activities at such high school, as long as such commercial name,
image, and likeness activity complies with school policy and the policies
of any athletic or activities association of which such student-
participant's school is a member;
(b) Prohibit a student-participant from engaging in any commercial
name, image, and likeness activity that:
(i) Uses or refers to school property and identifiers or conflicts
with any school contract or any contract of the athletic or activities
association to which such school is a member, except that a student-
-2-

LB1046 LB1046
2026 2026
participant may submit game footage or performance materials for purposes
of scholarship offers or postsecondary recruitment purposes;
(ii) Occurs during official school hours or the hours of such
student-participant's school-sponsored athletic event or activity;
(iii) Is used by any individual or organization, including a school
or school employee, to recruit or induce a student-participant to enroll
in or transfer to such school; and
(iv) Promotes any of the following:
(A) Alcohol, tobacco, vaping products;
(B) Controlled substances;
(C) Gambling, lotteries, or sports betting;
(D) Adult entertainment;
(E) Weapons or firearms;
(F) Any illegal products or services; or
(G) Any content in violation of federal, state, or school policy;
(c) Include a process for a student-participant to disclose any
commercial name, image, or likeness activity to a designated school
official prior to or within five business days of engaging in a
commercial name, image, or likeness activity for approval or review. Such
process shall include an appeal process;
(d) Require a designated school official to notify any applicable
athletic or activities association to which such school is a member of
any information received pursuant to subdivision (2)(c) of this section
as soon as administratively possible after receiving such disclosure;
(e) Include procedures for specific commercial name, image, or
likeness activities disclosure and review of any contract signed by a
student-participant or the parent or legal guardian on behalf of a
student-participant that is younger than eighteen years of age;
(f) Specify how such policy will be enforced and any penalties for
noncompliance with the policy, which should not include monetary
penalties, but may include temporary ineligibility for athletic or
-3-

LB1046 LB1046
2026 2026
activity participation; and
(g) Include education for student-participants and their families on
commercial name, image, and likeness activities, including tax and
financial implications.
(3) Beginning with school year 2027-28, each school board of a
school district that provides school-sponsored interscholastic athletics
or activities and is a member of an athletic or activities association
shall adopt a policy consistent with the model policy developed by the
State Board of Education pursuant to this section.
(4) A student-participant shall not be penalized, declared
ineligible, or disciplined by a school district or athletic association
to which such student-participant's school is a member for participating
in any commercial name, image, or likeness activity conducted in
accordance with a school policy adopted pursuant to this section.
-4-